Washington statutes.
RCW 43.320.030

Director—Qualifications—Conflicts of interest.

A person is not eligible for appointment as director of financial institutions unless he or she is, and for the last two years before his or her appointment has been, a citizen of the United States. A person is not eligible for appointment as director of financial institutions if he or she has an interest at the time of appointment, as a director, trustee, officer, or stockholder in any bank, savings bank, savings and loan association, credit union, consumer loan company, trust company, securities broker-dealer or investment advisor, or other institution regulated by the department.

[ 1993 c 472 s 4.]